New York, session 2025-2026, S9941.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subsection (s) of section 3425 of the insurance law, as 2 added by chapter 408 of the laws of 2011, is amended to read as follows: 3 (s) With respect to automobile insurance, no insurer shall refuse to 4 issue or renew a covered individually-owned private passenger policy 5 solely on the [ground] grounds that the motor vehicle to be insured 6 under such policy shall be used for volunteer firefighting or for 7 performing volunteer services for a nonprofit charitable organization or 8 governmental agency consisting of providing social service transporta- 9 tion. 10 § 2. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 11 have become a law and shall apply to insurance policies issued or deliv- 12 ered on and after such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09933-03-6